Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1147.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-157. President Dominick J. Ruggerio Senate Chamber.
The Rhode Island Senate Chamber in the Rhode Island State House shall be named and
known as "President Dominick J. Ruggerio Senate Chamber".
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002904
========